Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5033.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-64-14.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-64 entitled "Rhode
Island Commerce Corporation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-64-14.1. Exclusive jurisdiction of general assembly to approve or deny oil refinery
or nuclear plant project plans. Exclusive jurisdiction of general assembly to approve or deny
oil refinery project plans.
The final approval or denial of a project plan for the location and construction of an oil
refinery or a nuclear plant within the state is hereby expressly reserved to the general assembly
notwithstanding any general or public law or ordinance to the contrary, and exclusively within the
jurisdiction of the general assembly. The exclusive jurisdiction is vested in the general assembly
notwithstanding any other general, special, or public law to the contrary, including, but not limited
to, those laws granting regulatory powers to the cities and towns, and any ordinances enacted
pursuant to these laws.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000508
========